Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-113.1 of Title 26, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Any proposal that provides for an increase to any tax levy,


extends the levy of a tax, or authorizes this state, any political


subdivision of this state, or any entity to levy a tax, which is


submitted to voters for approval shall be printed in such a manner


as to include, above the proposition, the following language: “THIS


IS A TAX INCREASE.” The language shall be conspicuous as the term


is defined in Section 1-201 of Title 12A of the Oklahoma Statutes.



Req. No. 1222 Page 1


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 6-113, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 6-113. A. Ballots Except as provided for in subsection


B of this section, ballots for state questions shall be printed in


such a manner as to include the number of the state question, the


ballot title, and the following language,: “SHALL THE PROPOSAL BE


APPROVED?” followed by the words “FOR THE PROPOSAL - YES” and


“AGAINST THE PROPOSAL - NO”, one above the other.


B. If the state question provides for an increase to any tax


levy, extends the levy of a tax, or authorizes this state, any


political subdivision of this state, or any entity to levy a tax,


the ballot shall include above the ballot title and below the number


of the state question the following language: “THIS IS A TAX


INCREASE.” The language shall be conspicuous as the term is defined


in Section 1-201 of Title 12A of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1222 QD 1/16/2025 3:46:24 PM













Req. No. 1222 Page 2